Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.047

Warren Featherstone Reid Award for Excellence in Health Care.

The governor, in conjunction with the secretary of health, shall identify and honor health care providers and facilities in Washington state who exhibit exceptional quality and value in the delivery of health services. The award shall be given annually consistent with the availability of qualified nominees. The secretary may appoint an advisory committee to assist in the selection of nominees, if necessary.

[ 1994 c 7 s 3.]